Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1962.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Prohibition of Taxpayer Funded Abortion-Related Activities Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abortion-related activity." Includes, but is not limited to, the performance of an abortion, facilitating the procurement of abortion services or providing abortion services."Department." The Department of Human Services of the 1234567891011121314151617181920 Commonwealth."State agency." Includes an agency, board, commission, authority or any department of the Commonwealth.Section 3. Prohibition of funds.A State agency may not provide money, whether through a grant, contract, State-administered Federal money or any other form, to a person directly affiliated with another person providing an abortion-related activity.Section 4. Agency directive.A State agency may not renew or extend a contract, grant, memorandum or other agreement with a person that is directly affiliated with another person providing an abortion-related activity.Section 5. Agency procedures.A State agency shall update its contracting procedures to exclude from new or renewed participation in a program a person that:(1) provides an abortion-related activity; or(2) is under common ownership or control with a person engaged in an abortion-related activity.Section 6. Reallocation of money.Money that is not allocated by a State agency due to the prohibition under section 3 shall be reallocated to entities providing counseling and alternatives to abortion-related activities through a grant program to be established by the department. The Secretary of the Budget shall certify the amount to be reallocated within 180 days of the effective date of this section. The money for the grant program authorized under this section may not be transferred or diverted to any other purpose by administrative action.20250HB1962PN2477 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. Duties of the Department of Human Services.The department shall:(1) Require, as a condition of participation in the medical assistance program, that a person submit a signed attestation disclosing whether the person or any related persons engage in an abortion-related activity.(2) Adopt appropriate procedures to verify compliance with this act.(3) Take any necessary enforcement actions, including nonrenewal, denial, exclusion or termination from the medical assistance program, for a person found to be in violation of this act.(4) Issue communications of the requirements of this act and complete implementation of the revised standards within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph.Section 8. Regulations.A State agency may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this act pertaining to the oversight of persons under the State agency's purview.Section 9. Reports.A State agency shall issue a report within one year after the effective date of this section detailing the State agency's actions taken under this act, including any rule changes, number of entities affected, the amount of money saved and compliance measures adopted. The Governor may issue one report that compiles the information from each State agency. The report shall be submitted to:(1) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(3) The Minority Leader of the Senate.20250HB1962PN2477 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1962PN2477 - 4 - 123